Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1311.05
Sections; no condition precedent to acquisition of rights-of-way.

Nothing in sections 39-1311 to 39-1311.05 shall be deemed a condition precedent to the acquisition of rights-of-way by purchase or by eminent domain.

Laws 1974, LB 805, § 6.